Utah statutes.
53A-2-117.   Definitions.

As used in Sections 53A-2-117 through 53A-2-121:

(1)  "Allocation date" means:

(a)  June 30 of the second calendar year after the creation election date; or

(b)  another date that the transition teams under Section 53A-1-118.1 mutually agree to.

(2)  "Canvass date" means the date of the canvass of an election under Subsection 53A-2-118(5) at which voters approve the creation of a new school district under Section 53A-2-118.1.

(3)  "Creation election date" means the date of the election under Subsection 53A-2-118(5) at which voters approve the creation of a new school district under Section 53A-2-118.1.

(4)  "Divided school district, "existing district," or "existing school district" means a school district from which a new district is created.

(5)  "New district" or "new school district" means a school district created under Section 53A-2-118 or 53A-2-118.1.

(6)  "Remaining district" or "remaining school district" means an existing district after the creation of a new district.

